Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-56] Liabilities. (a) The
State, the Maui regional system board, or the corporation, separately or
collectively, shall be responsible for any and all obligations incurred by the
facility or facilities to be transferred, the Maui regional system, or the
corporation prior to the transfer completion date including any accounts
payable, accrued paid time off, debt, capital leases, malpractice liabilities,
and other obligations incurred before the transfer completion date. Any and
all liabilities of the pre-transfer facility that were transferred to the
corporation upon its creation by Act 262, Session Laws of Hawaii 1996, all
liabilities of the pre-transfer facility related to collective bargaining
contracts negotiated by the State, and the liability for all current
outstanding post-employment benefits of the regional system or the corporation
shall remain the responsibility of the State.

(b) All liabilities arising out of a
transferred facility's management and operation in a transferred facility, on
or after the transfer completion date, shall be the responsibility of the
private entity or its nonprofit management entity. [L 2015, c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next